Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-252
Officers; reports required.

A primary city may require of any officer of the city, at any time, a detailed report of the transactions of his office or any matters connected therewith.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, LII, p. 140;

R.S.1913, § 4462;

C.S.1922, § 3847;

C.S.1929, § 15-250;

R.S.1943, § 15-252.